Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Credit card processing fee" means the total percentage rate
charged by a payment processor, acquirer, or similar financial
institution to a business for the processing of credit card or debit
card transactions; and

Req. No. 15971 Page 1

2. "Eligible business entity" means a general partnership,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
liability limited partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, trust, estate or any other lawfully recognized entity
which accepts payment for goods or services by means of a credit
card or debit card.
B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the portion of the eligible business
entity's credit card processing fees that exceeds two percent (2%)
of the gross amount of all credit card or debit card transactions
processed during the taxable year.
C. The credit authorized pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be allocable to the partners, shareholders, members,
or other equity owners of an eligible business entity that is
authorized to be treated as a partnership for purposes of federal
income tax reporting for the taxable year for which the tax credit
authorized by this section is claimed on the applicable return,
together with required schedules, forms, or reports of the partners,
shareholders, members, or other equity owners of the eligible
business entity.


Req. No. 15971 Page 2

D. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to
reduce the income tax liability of the eligible business entity to
less than zero (0).
E. To the extent not used, the credit authorized by this
section shall be allowed to carry over, in order, to each of the
five (5) following taxable years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-15971 AO 02/03/26















Req. No. 15971 Page 3